Maine, session 132, LD1731.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §4301, as amended by PL 1989, c. 503, Pt. B, §102, is further
amended to read:
§4301. Board established
The Maine State Ferry Advisory Board, established by Title 5, section 12004‑I,
subsection 82, and in this section chapter called "the board," shall be is a board within the
Department of Transportation.
Sec. 2. 23 MRSA §4306 is enacted to read:
§4306. Consultation with Maine State Ferry Service
The Maine State Ferry Service shall consult the board on the development of the Maine
State Ferry Service budget and strategic planning and major operational decisions
regarding the Maine State Ferry Service. Recommendations made by the board regarding
rider experience, fare structures, schedules, route planning, vessel maintenance and other
operational aspects of the Maine State Ferry Service must be considered by the Maine State
Ferry Service.
Sec. 3. 23 MRSA §4307 is enacted to read:
§4307. Maine State Ferry Service reporting
1. Annual report. The Maine State Ferry Service shall provide an annual report to the
board that includes the following:
A. Financial performance and budget utilization;
B. Rider feedback and satisfaction surveys; and
C. Operational challenges and improvements.
2. Feedback. The board shall review the report provided pursuant to subsection 1 and
provide feedback and recommendations to the Maine State Ferry Service for consideration.
Sec. 4. 23 MRSA §4308 is enacted to read:
§4308. Annual review; report and recommendations
The board shall conduct an annual review of the Maine State Ferry Service's
performance and operations and provide a report to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over transportation matters by January 15th of each year.
The report must include recommendations for improvements to Maine State Ferry Service
operations and suggested funding. The recommendations in the report must be considered
by the Maine State Ferry Service during its decision-making processes for the following
fiscal year.